en: outside Germany
da: udenfor Tyskland
fr: hors Allemagne
sv: utanför Tyskland, icke-Tyskland, inte Tyskland, inte från Tyskland

en: Europe
xx: Europa
af: Europa
ar: أوروبا
az: Avropa
be: Еўропа
bg: Европа
bn: ইউরোপ
ca: Europa
cs: Evropa
da: Europa
de: Europa
el: Ευρώπη
eo: Eŭropo
es: Europa
et: Euroopa
fa: اروپا
fi: Eurooppa
fr: Europe
he: אירופה
hi: यूरोप
hr: Europa
hu: Európa
id: Eropa
it: Europa
ja: ヨーロッパ
ko: 유럽
lt: Europa
lv: Eiropa
mk: Европа
ms: Eropah
nl: Europa
no: Europa
pl: Europa
pt: Europa
ro: Europa
ru: Европа
sk: Európa
sl: Evropa
sq: Evropa
sr: Европа
sv: Europa
sw: Ulaya
th: ยุโรป
tr: Avrupa
uk: Європа
ur: یورپ
vi: Châu Âu
zh: 欧洲

en: European Union, EU
af: Europese Unie, EU
ar: الاتحاد الأوروبي, الاتحاد الأوربي, EU
az: Avropa İttifaqı, Aİ
be: Еўрапейскі саюз, ЕС
bg: Европейски съюз, ЕС
bn: ইউরোপীয় ইউনিয়ন, ইইউ
ca: Unió Europea, UE
cs: Evropská unie, EU
da: Den Europæiske Union, EU
de: Europäische Union, EU
ee: Euroopa Liit, EL
el: Ευρωπαϊκή Ένωση, ΕΕ
eo: Eŭropa Unio, EU
es: Unión Europea, UE
et: Euroopa Liit, EL
eu: Europar Batasuna, EB
fa: اتحادیه اروپا, EU
fi: Euroopan unioni, EU
fr: Union Européenne, UE
he: האיחוד האירופי, EU
hi: यूरोपीय संघ, ईयू
hr: Europska Unija, EU, u EU
hu: Európai Unió, EU
id: Uni Eropa, UE
it: Unione Europea, EU
ja: 欧州連合, EU
ko: 유럽 연합, EU
lt: Europos Sąjunga, ES
lv: Eiropas Savienība, ES
mk: Европска Унија, ЕУ
ms: Kesatuan Eropah, EU
nl: Europese Unie, EU
pl: Unia Europejska, UE, EU
pt: União Europeia, UE
ro: Uniunea Europeană, UE
ru: Европейский союз, ЕС
sk: Európska únia, EÚ
sl: Evropska unija, EU
sq: Bashkimi Evropian, BE
sr: Европска Унија, ЕУ
sv: Europeiska unionen, EU
th: สหภาพยุโรป, EU
tr: Avrupa Birliği, AB
uk: Європейський союз, ЄС
ur: یورپی یونین, EU
vi: Liên minh Châu Âu, EU
zh: 欧盟, EU

en: Non European Union, Non EU
xx: Non European Union, Non EU
af: Nie-Europese Unie, Nie-EU
ar: خارج الاتحاد الأوروبي, غير عضو في الاتحاد الأوروبي
az: Avropa Birliyinə daxil olmayan, AB-dən kənar
be: Не член Еўрапейскага Саюза, па-за межамі ЕС
bg: Извън Европейския съюз, Извън ЕС
bn: ইউরোপীয় ইউনিয়নের বাইরে, ইইউ নয়
ca: No Unió Europea, No UE
cs: Ne Evropská unie, mimo EU
da: Ikke-EU
de: Nicht-Europäische Union, Nicht-EU
ee: mitte EL
el: Εκτός Ευρωπαϊκής Ένωσης, εκτός ΕΕ
es: No Unión Europea, No UE
et: Mitte Euroopa Liidu, mitte EL
fi: ei-EU
fr: Non Union Européenne, Non UE, Hors Union Européenne
he: לא חבר באיחוד האירופי, לא באיחוד האירופי
hi: गैर यूरोपीय संघ, गैर ईयू
hr: izvan EU
hu: Nem Európai Unió, Nem-EU, EU-n kívüli, Európai Unión kívüli
id: Bukan Uni Eropa, Non-UE
it: Non UE
ja: 非ヨーロッパ連合, 非EU
ko: 비 유럽 연합, 비 EU
nl: Buiten Europese Unie, Non EU, Niet EU Landbouw
pl: spoza Unii Europejskiej, spoza UE
pt: Fora da União Europeia
ru: Не входит в Европейский Союз, не является членом ЕС
sq: Jo Bashkimi Evropian, Jo BE
sr: Изван Европске Уније, није чланица ЕУ
sv: Icke-Europeiska Unionen, Icke-EU, Utanför EU
tr: Avrupa Birliği üyesi olmayan, AB üyesi olmayan
uk: Не є членом Європейського Союзу, не є членом ЄС
zh: 非欧盟国家，非欧盟

en: European Union and Non European Union, EU and non EU, EU non EU
af: Europese Unie en Nie-Europese Unie, EU en nie-EU
ar: الاتحاد الأوروبي وخارج الاتحاد الأوروبي ، الاتحاد الأوروبي وغير الاتحاد الأوروبي
az: Avropa Birliyi və Avropa Birliyinə daxil olmayan, AB və AB xaricində
bg: Европейски съюз и Извън Европейския съюз, ЕС и извън ЕС
ca: Unió Europea i no Unió Europea, UE i no UE
cs: Evropská unie a země mimo Evropskou unii, EU a mimo EU
da: EU og ikke-EU, EU og ikke EU
de: Europäische Union und Nicht-Europäische Union, EU und Nicht-EU
el: Ευρωπαϊκή Ένωση και μη Ευρωπαϊκή Ένωση, ΕΕ και μη ΕΕ
es: Unión Europea y no Unión Europea, UE y no UE
et: Euroopa Liit ja mitte Euroopa Liit, EL ja mitte EL
fi: Euroopan unioni ja muu kuin Euroopan unioni, EU ja muu kuin EU
fr: Union Européenne et Non Union Européenne, UE et non UE, UE non UE
he: האיחוד האירופי ולא האיחוד האירופי, האיחוד האירופי ולא האיחוד האירופי
hr: u/izvan EU
hu: EU és Nem-EU, Európai Unió és nem Európai Unió
id: Uni Eropa dan Non Uni Eropa, UE dan non UE
it: UE e non UE, UE non UE
ja: 欧州連合と非欧州連合、EUと非EU
ko: 유럽 연합 및 비 유럽 연합, EU 및 비 EU
nl: Europese Unie en niet-Europese Unie, EU en niet-EU
pl: Unia Europejska i spoza Unii Europejskiej
pt: União Europeia e não União Europeia, UE e não UE
ro: Uniunea Europeană și non-Uniunea Europeană, UE și non-UE
ru: Европейский союз и не входящие в Европейский союз страны, ЕС и не-ЕС
sk: Európska únia a krajiny mimo Európskej únie, EÚ a mimo EÚ
sq: Bashkimi Evropian dhe jo Bashkimi Evropian, BE dhe jo BE
sv: Europeiska unionen och icke-europeiska unionen, EU och icke-EU
tr: Avrupa Birliği ve Avrupa Birliği üyesi olmayan ülkeler, AB ve AB üyesi olmayan ülkeler
uk: Європейський Союз та країни, що не входять до Європейського Союзу, ЄС та не-ЄС
zh: 欧盟和非欧盟国家，欧盟和非欧盟

en: The Alps, Alps
de: Die Alpen, Alpen

en: Nordic countries, Nordics, Nordic region
an: países nordicos
ar: دول الشمال
az: Skandinav ölkələri
be: Краіны Паўночнай Еўропы
bg: Скандинавски страни
bn: নর্ডীয় রাষ্ট্রসমূহ
bs: Nordijska regija
ca: països nòrdics
cs: Severské státy
cy: Y Gwledydd Nordig
da: Norden, de nordiske lande
de: Nordische Länder
el: Νορδικές χώρες
eo: Nordio, Nordiaj landoj, Nordia regiono
es: países nórdicos
et: Põhjamaad
eu: Eskandinaviako herrialdeak
fa: سرزمین‌های شمالی
fi: Pohjoismaat
fo: Norðurlond
fr: pays nordiques
ga: Na Stáit Nordacha
gl: países nórdicos
gv: Çheeraghyn Nordagh
hi: नॉर्डिक देश
hr: Nordijska regija
hu: északi országok
hy: Հյուսիսային Եվրոպայի երկրներ
ia: Paises nordic
id: Negara-negara Nordik
io: Nordia
is: Norðurlöndin
it: Paesi nordici
ja: 北欧
jv: Negara Nordik
kl: Nunat Avannarliit
ko: 노르딕 국가
ku: welatên skandînavî
lb: Nordesch Länner
lt: Šiaurės šalys
lv: Ziemeļvalstis
mg: Firenena nôrdika
mk: Нордиски земји
ml: നോർഡിക് രാജ്യങ്ങൾ
ms: Negara-negara Nordic
mt: Pajjiżi Nordiċi
nb: Norden, de nordiske landene
nl: Noordse landen
nn: Norden
pl: Kraje nordyckie
pt: Países nórdicos
ro: țările nordice
ru: страны Северной Европы
sc: Paisos nòrdicos
sd: نورڊڪ ملڪ
se: Davviriikkat
sh: Nordijska regija
sk: Severské štáty
sl: nordijske države
sq: Vendet Nordike
sr: Нордијске земље
sv: Norden, de nordiska länderna
ta: நோர்டிக் நாடுகள்
te: నార్డిక్ దేశాలు
th: กลุ่มนอร์ดิก
tl: Mga bansang Nordiko
tr: İskandinav ülkeleri
uk: Скандинавські країни
ur: شمالی ممالک
vi: Các nước Bắc Âu
zh: 北欧五国, 北歐五國

en: Auvergne-Rhône-Alpes
xx: Auvergne-Rhône-Alpes

en: Ain
xx: Ain

en: Bugey
xx: Bugey

en: Allier
xx: Allier

en: Ardèche
xx: Ardèche
bg: Ардеш

en: Cantal
xx: Cantal

en: Drôme
xx: Drôme

en: Nyons
xx: Nyons

en: Isère
xx: Isère

en: Loire
xx: Loire

en: Haute-Loire
xx: Haute-Loire

fr: Puy-de-Dôme
xx: Puy-de-Dôme

en: Rhône
xx: Rhône